Connecticut, session 2026, SB00257.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 47a-23c of the general statutes is repealed and the
2 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
3 (a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, this
4 section applies to any tenant who resides in a building or complex
5 consisting of five or more separate dwelling units or who resides in a
6 mobile manufactured home park and who: [is either: (A) Sixty-two] (A)
7 Is sixty-two years of age or older, or whose spouse, sibling, parent or
8 grandparent is sixty-two years of age or older and permanently resides
9 with that tenant, [or] (B) is a person with a physical or mental disability,
10 as defined in subdivision (12) of section 46a-64b, or whose spouse,
11 sibling, child, parent or grandparent is a person with a physical or
12 mental disability who permanently resides with that tenant, but only if
13 such disability can be expected to result in death or to last for a
14 continuous period of at least twelve months, or (C) has resided in such
15 building, complex or mobile manufactured home park pursuant to a
16 rental agreement for not less than twelve months, provided the landlord
17 did not (i) give a notice to quit possession to the tenant pursuant to
18 subparagraph (A) of subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of section 47a-23,
19 as amended by this act, or subdivisions (2) and (3) of subsection (a) of
LCO 1 of 7

Substitute Bill No. 257
20 section 47a-23, as amended by this act, during a lease period of more
21 than twelve months, and (ii) bring a summary process action pursuant
22 to chapter 832 against the tenant within ninety days of the date to quit
23 possession provided in such notice, which resulted in a judgment that
24 the landlord recover possession or occupancy of the premises. This
25 section shall not apply to a tenant who is the subject of a pending
26 summary process action that has been brought as described in
27 subparagraph (C) of this subdivision.
28 (2) With respect to tenants in common interest communities, this
29 section applies only to (A) a conversion tenant, as defined in
30 [subsection] subdivision (3) of section 47-283, who (i) is described in
31 subdivision (1) of this subsection, or (ii) is not described in subdivision
32 (1) of this subsection but, during a transition period, as defined in
33 [subsection] subdivision (4) of section 47-283, is residing in a conversion
34 condominium created after May 6, 1980, or in any other conversion
35 common interest community created after December 31, 1982, or (iii) is
36 not described in subdivision (1) of this subsection but is otherwise
37 protected as a conversion tenant by public act 80-370, and (B) a tenant
38 who is not a conversion tenant but who is described in subdivision (1)
39 of this subsection if [his] such tenant's landlord owns five or more
40 dwelling units in the common interest community in which the
41 dwelling unit is located.
42 (3) As used in this section, "tenant" includes each resident of a mobile
43 manufactured home park, as defined in section 21-64, including a
44 resident who owns [his own home] the home in which such resident
45 resides, "landlord" includes a "licensee" and an "owner" of a mobile
46 manufactured home park, as defined in section 21-64, "complex" means
47 two or more buildings on the same or contiguous parcels of real
48 property under the same ownership, and "mobile manufactured home
49 park" means a parcel of real property, or contiguous parcels of real
50 property under the same ownership, upon which five or more mobile
51 manufactured homes occupied for residential purposes are located.
52 (b) (1) No landlord may bring an action of summary process or other
LCO 2 of 7

Substitute Bill No. 257
53 action to dispossess a tenant described in subsection (a) of this section
54 except for one or more of the following reasons: (A) Nonpayment of
55 rent; (B) refusal to agree to a fair and equitable rent increase, as [defined]
56 described in subsection (c) of this section; (C) material noncompliance
57 with section 47a-11 or subsection (b) of section 21-82, which materially
58 affects the health and safety of the other tenants or which materially
59 affects the physical condition of the premises; (D) voiding of the rental
60 agreement pursuant to section 47a-31, or material noncompliance with
61 the rental agreement; (E) material noncompliance with the rules and
62 regulations of the landlord adopted in accordance with section 47a-9 or
63 21-70; (F) permanent removal by the landlord of the dwelling unit of
64 such tenant from the housing market; [or] (G) bona fide intention by the
65 landlord to use such dwelling unit as [his] such landlord's principal
66 residence; or (H) if the tenant is not an individual described in
67 subparagraph (A) or (B) of subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this
68 section, bona fide intention by the landlord to use such dwelling unit as
69 the principal residence for such landlord's child, grandchild, parent or
70 grandparent, provided in either case (i) the landlord is a natural person,
71 (ii) the landlord gave such tenant at least ninety days' advance written
72 notice, (iii) there is no other unit in the building or complex or mobile
73 manufactured home park reasonably available to the landlord or such
74 landlord's relative at that time or within a reasonable period of time, and
75 (iv) the landlord has a bona fide belief that such use for principal
76 residency will continue for not less than six months.
77 (2) The [ground] grounds stated in [subparagraph] subparagraphs
78 (G) and (H) of subdivision (1) of this subsection [is] are not available to
79 the owner of a dwelling unit in a common interest community occupied
80 by a conversion tenant.
81 (3) A tenant may not be dispossessed for a reason described in
82 subparagraph (B), (F), [or] (G) or (H) of subdivision (1) of this subsection
83 during the term of any existing rental agreement.
84 (c) (1) The rent of a tenant protected by this section may be increased
85 only to the extent that such increase is fair and equitable, based on the
LCO 3 of 7

Substitute Bill No. 257
86 criteria set forth in section 7-148c.
87 (2) Any such tenant aggrieved by a rent increase or proposed rent
88 increase may file a complaint with the fair rent commission, if any, for
89 the town, city or borough where [his] such tenant's dwelling unit or
90 mobile manufactured home park lot is located; or, if no such fair rent
91 commission exists, may bring an action in the Superior Court to contest
92 the increase. In any such court proceeding, the court shall determine
93 whether the rent increase is fair and equitable, based on the criteria set
94 forth in section 7-148c.
95 (d) A landlord, to determine whether a tenant is a protected tenant,
96 as described in subparagraph (A) or (B) of subdivision (1) of subsection
97 (a) of this section, when such protected status is not readily apparent to
98 a landlord, may request proof of such protected status. [On such] Upon
99 request, any tenant claiming protection shall provide proof of the
100 protected status within thirty days. [The] If such protected status is
101 based on the physical or mental disability of the tenant or the spouse,
102 sibling, child, parent or grandparent who resides with such tenant, such
103 proof [shall] may include evidence of receipt of Social Security disability
104 benefits or supplemental security income, a statement of a [physician or
105 an advanced practice registered nurse in the case of alleged blindness or
106 other physical disability] medical professional, social services agency,
107 counselor, case manager or peer support group concerning such
108 disability or a statement from another reliable third party who is in a
109 position to know about such person's disability. Evidence of receipt of
110 Social Security disability benefits or supplemental security income shall
111 constitute proof of protected status.
112 (e) (1) On and after January 1, 2024, whenever a dwelling unit located
113 in a building or complex consisting of five or more separate dwelling
114 units or in a mobile manufactured home park is rented to, or a rental
115 agreement is entered into or renewed with, a tenant, the landlord of
116 such dwelling unit or such landlord's agent shall provide such tenant
117 with written notice of the provisions of subsections (b) and (c) of this
118 section in a form as described in subdivision (2) of this subsection and
LCO 4 of 7

Substitute Bill No. 257
119 on and after January 1, 2027, the landlord or agent shall provide the
120 revised notice created under said subdivision.
121 (2) Not later than December 1, 2023, the Commissioner of Housing
122 shall create a notice to be used by landlords, pursuant to subdivision (1)
123 of this subsection, to inform tenants of the rights provided to protected
124 tenants under subsections (b) and (c) of this section. Such notice shall be
125 a one-page, plain-language summary of such rights and shall be
126 available in both English and Spanish. Not later than December 1, 2023,
127 such notice shall be posted on the Department of Housing's Internet web
128 site. Not later than December 1, 2026, the Commissioner of Housing
129 shall revise such notice in accordance with the provisions of this section
130 and shall post such revised notice on the Department of Housing's
131 Internet web site.
132 (3) Not later than December 1, 2028, the commissioner shall (A)
133 translate the notice required under subdivision (2) of this subsection
134 into the five most commonly spoken languages in the state, as
135 determined by the commissioner, and (B) post such translations on the
136 Department of Housing's Internet web site not later than December 1,
137 2028.
138 Sec. 2. Subsection (i) of section 47-88b of the general statutes is
139 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
140 1, 2026):
141 (i) After the conversion of a dwelling unit in a building to
142 condominium ownership, the declarant or unit owner, for the purpose
143 of determining if a lessee's eviction is prohibited under subsection (b) of
144 section 47a-23c, as amended by this act, may ask any lessee to provide
145 proof of the age, blindness or physical disability of such lessee or any
146 person residing with him, or of the familial relationship existing
147 between such lessee and any person residing with him. The lessee shall
148 provide such proof, within thirty days, including, in the case of alleged
149 physical disability, evidence of receipt of Social Security disability
150 benefits or supplemental security income, a statement of a [physician, a
LCO 5 of 7

Substitute Bill No. 257
151 physician assistant or an advanced practice registered nurse or, in the
152 case of alleged blindness, a statement of a physician, an advanced
153 practice registered nurse or an optometrist, within thirty days] medical
154 professional, social services agency, counselor, case manager or peer
155 support group concerning such disability or a statement from another
156 reliable third party who is in a position to know about such person's
157 disability. Evidence of receipt of Social Security disability benefits or
158 supplemental security income shall constitute proof of protected status.
159 Sec. 3. Subsection (a) of section 47a-23 of the 2026 supplement to the
160 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
161 thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
162 (a) When the owner or lessor, or the owner's or lessor's legal
163 representative, or the owner's or lessor's attorney-at-law, or in-fact,
164 desires to obtain possession or occupancy of any land or building, any
165 apartment in any building, any dwelling unit, any trailer, or any land
166 upon which a trailer is used or stands, and (1) when a rental agreement
167 or lease of such property, whether in writing or by parol, terminates for
168 any of the following reasons: (A) By lapse of time; (B) by reason of any
169 expressed stipulation therein; (C) violation of the rental agreement or
170 lease or of any rules or regulations adopted in accordance with section
171 47a-9 or 21-70; (D) nonpayment of rent within the grace period provided
172 for residential property in section 47a-15a or 21-83, except this
173 subparagraph shall not apply if the owner or lessor's online rental
174 payment system prevents such payment of rent within the grace period
175 provided for residential property in section 47a-15a or 21-83; (E)
176 nonpayment of rent when due for commercial property; (F) violation of
177 section 47a-11 or subsection (b) of section 21-82; or (G) nuisance, as
178 defined in section 47a-32, or serious nuisance, as defined in section
179 47a-15 or 21-80; or (2) when such premises, or any part thereof, is
180 occupied by one who never had a right or privilege to occupy such
181 premises; or (3) when one originally had the right or privilege to occupy
182 such premises but such right or privilege has terminated; or (4) when an
183 action of summary process or other action to dispossess a tenant is
184 authorized under subsection (b) of section 47a-23c, as amended by this
LCO 6 of 7

Substitute Bill No. 257
185 act, for any of the following reasons: (A) Refusal to agree to a fair and
186 equitable rent increase, as defined in subsection (c) of section 47a-23c, as
187 amended by this act, (B) permanent removal by the landlord of the
188 dwelling unit of such tenant from the housing market, [or] (C) bona fide
189 intention by the landlord to use such dwelling unit as such landlord's
190 principal residence, or (D) bona fide intention by the landlord to use
191 such dwelling unit as the principal residence for such landlord's child,
192 grandchild, parent or grandparent pursuant to the provisions of
193 subparagraph (H) of subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of section 47a-23c,
194 as amended by this act; or (5) when a farm employee, as described in
195 section 47a-30, or a domestic servant, caretaker, manager or other
196 employee, as described in subsection (b) of section 47a-36, occupies such
197 premises furnished by the employer and fails to vacate such premises
198 after employment is terminated by such employee or the employer or
199 after such employee fails to report for employment, such owner or
200 lessor, or such owner's or lessor's legal representative, or such owner's
201 or lessor's attorney-at-law, or in-fact, shall give notice to each lessee or
202 occupant to quit possession or occupancy of such land, building,
203 apartment or dwelling unit, at least three days before the termination of
204 the rental agreement or lease, if any, or before the time specified in the
205 notice for the lessee or occupant to quit possession or occupancy.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 47a-23c
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 47-88b(i)
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 47a-23(a)
HSG Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 7 of 7